District of Columbia statutes.
25-785

Delivery, offer, or otherwise making available to persons under 21; penalties.

(a)

A person who is not a licensee shall not, within the District, purchase an alcoholic beverage for the purpose of delivering the alcoholic beverage to a person who is under 21 years of age.

(b)

A person who is a licensee shall not, within the District, offer, give, provide, or otherwise make available an alcoholic beverage to a person who is under 21 years of age, except if necessary to allow the person to perform lawful employment responsibilities that require the person to have temporary possession of alcoholic beverages.

(c)

A person who violates any provision of this section shall:

(1)

Upon conviction for the first offense, be fined not more then [than] $1,000, or imprisoned up to 180 days, or both;

(2)

Upon conviction for the second offense committed within 2 years from the date of any such previous offense, be fined not more than $2,500, or imprisoned up to 180 days, or both;

(3)

Upon conviction for the third or any subsequent offense committed within 2 years from the date of any such previous offense, be fined not more than $5,000, or imprisoned up to one year, or both.

(d)

A person alleged to have violated this section may be issued a citation under § 23-1110(b)(1). The person shall not be eligible to forfeit collateral.

(e)

The fines set forth in this section shall not be limited by [§ 22-3571.01].

Jan. 24, 1934, ch. 4, § 30a
as added May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(k), 41 DCR 1658
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 113(c), 60 DCR 2064
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 113(c) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added (e).
1981 Ed., § 25-785.
This section is referenced in § 7-403.